test/src/morphology/N-kasi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - käsi - ok : # Noun 'år' - ei tsekattu
     käsi+N+Sg+Nom: käsi
     käsi+N+Sg+Gen: käđen
     käsi+N+Sg+Par: kättä
     käsi+N+Sg+Tra: käđeksi
     käsi+N+Sg+Abe: käđettä
     käsi+N+Sg+Ine: käđessä
     käsi+N+Sg+Ela: käđestä
     käsi+N+Sg+Ill: kätheen
     käsi+N+Sg+Ade: käđelä
     käsi+N+Sg+Abl: käđeltä
     käsi+N+Sg+All: käđele
     käsi+N+Sg+Ess: kätenä
     käsi+N+Pl+Nom: käđet
     käsi+N+Pl+Gen: kässiin
     käsi+N+Pl+Par: kässii
     käsi+N+Pl+Tra: käsiksi
     käsi+N+Pl+Abe: käsittä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ine: käsissä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ela: käsistä
     käsi+N+Pl+Ill: käshiin
     käsi+N+Pl+Ade: käsilä
     käsi+N+Pl+Abl: käsiltä
     käsi+N+Pl+All: käsile
     käsi+N+Pl+Ess: käsinä
     käsi+N+Pl+Com: käsine
